Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6827YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2390 Section 1. Section 15.354, subsection 4, paragraph g, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 g. The authority shall issue tax incentives under the 4 program as the authority determines the workforce housing 5 project is complete and all of the requirements have been 6 met until the maximum amount of tax incentives allowed under 7 paragraph âaâ is reached. 8 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 9 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10